tools/nvda/louis/tables/my-g2.ctb
#-index-name: Burmese, contracted
#-display-name: Burmese contracted braille
#
#+language: my
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+dots: 6
#+direction: forward
#+system: myanmar
#
#-copyright: Sao Mai Center for the Blind <www.saomaicenter.org/en>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
#  Copyright (C) 2018 by Sao Mai Center for the Blind <www.saomaicenter.org/en>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
# Created and maintained by: Dang Hoai Phuc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
# with help from Benedict and Pyae Phyopaing from Myanmar
#
#-author: Dang Hoai Phúc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#-maintainer: Dang Hoai Phuc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#
#-updated: 2020-11-17
#
# Based on <https://github.com/liblouis/liblouis/files/5552381/MyanmarBrailleGrade2Contracted.zip>

include my-g1.utb

# ar contractions				
always အ	126
always အာ	1-36
always အာ့	1-126
always အား	1-23
always အိ	246-2
always ဣ	24
always အီ	246
always ဥ	136-2
always ဦး	136-23
always အူ	136
always အေး	156-23
always အဲ	2346-23
always အံ	1-1345
always အံ့	124-2
always အို	135
always အို့	135-2
always အိုး	135-23
always အက်	15
always ဥက်	236
always အောက်	356
always အိုက်	346
always အဂ်	15
always အင်	35
always အင့်	35-2
always အင်း	35-23
always အောင်	2356
always အောင့်	2356-2
always အောင်း	2356-23
always အိုင်	235
always အိုင့်	235-2
always အိုင်း	235-23
always အစ်	24-2345
always ဣစ်	24-2345
always ဥစ်	24-2345
always ဧည့်	2346-2
always အဋ်	126-2345
always ဣဋ်	126-2345
always ဥဏ်	14
always အတ်	126-2345
always အိတ်	156-13
always ဣတ်	156-13
always အုတ်	236
always ဥတ်	236
always ဣဒ်	126-2345
always အန်	1-1345
always အန့်	124-2
always အန်း	124-23
always အွန်	136-1345
always အွန့်	136-1345-2
always အွန်း	136-1345-23
always ဣန်	1-1345
always အုန်	14
always အုန့်	14-2
always အုန်း	14-23
always အပ်	126-2345
always အိပ်	156-13
always အုပ်	236
always အဗ်	126-2345
always အမ်း	124-23
always အိမ်	156-1345
always အိမ့်	156-1345-2
always အိမ်း	156-1345-23
always ဥမ်	14
always အုံ	14
always အုံး	14-23
always ဥုံ	14
always အုံ့	14-2
always အသ်	126-2345
always ဣသ်	126-2345
always ဥသ်	126-2345
always အော	12456-23
always အော့	12456-2
always အော်	12456
always ၎င်း	123-13
always ဤ	246
always ၌	1246
always ၍	12346-25
always ၏	24
always အဲ့	2346-2
always အဏ်	126-1345
always အိုလ်	135
always အယ်	2346
always အယ့်	2346-2
always ဧ	156
always အေ	156
always အေ့	156-2
always အွတ်	136-2345
always အဲလ်	2346-23-123-3
always ဥစ်	1346
always အက်	15
always အီ့	246-2
always အီး	246-23
always အူး	136-23
always ဦ	136
always အဉ့်	35-2
always အည်	246
always အည့်	246-2
always အည်း	246-23
always ဧည်	2346
always ဧည်း	2346-23
always ဥတ်	126-2345
always အုပ်	236
always အမ်	1-1345
always အမ့်	1-1345-2
always အတ်	126-2345
always အွ	126-2456-126
always အွာ	126-2456-1
always အွား	126-2456-1-23
always အွက်	126-2456-15
always အွစ်	126-2456-1346
always အွင်း	126-2456-35-23
always အွိ	126-2456-24
always အွီ	126-2456-246
always အွီး	126-2456-246-23
always အွမ်	126-2456-124
always အွမ့်	126-2456-124-2
always အွမ်း	126-2456-124-23
always အုက်	236
always အဏ်	1-1345
always အဏ့်	1-1345-2
always အဏ်း	1-1345-23
always အ​ဗ်	126-2345
always အုမ်	14
always အုမ့်	14-2
always အုမ်း	14-23
always အွ	126-2456-126
always အွာ့	126-2456-1-2
always အွား	126-2456-1-23
always အွံ	136-1345
always အွံ့	136-1345-2
always အိဗ်	156-13
# BaHtetChaunt contractions
always ဗ	12-126
always ဗာ	12-1
always ဗား	12-1-23
always ဗုဒ်	12-236
always ဗိ	12-24
always ဗီ	12-246
always ဗီး	12-246-23
always ဗု	12-136-2
always ဗူ	12-136
always ဗူး	12-136-23
always ဗေ	12-156
always ဗေ့	12-156-2
always ဗေး	12-156-23
always ဗို	12-135
always ဗို့	12-135-2
always ဗိုး	12-135-23
always ဗောက်	12-356
always ဗိုက်	12-346
always ဗင်	12-35
always ဗင့်	12-35-2
always ဗင်း	12-35-23
always ဗောင်	12-2356
always ဗောင့်	12-2356-2
always ဗောင်း	12-2356-23
always ဗိုင်	12-235
always ဗိုင့်	12-235-2
always ဗိုင်း	12-235-23
always ဗုဒ်	12-236
always ဗန်	12-124
always ဗန့်	12-124-2
always ဗန်း	12-124-23
always ဗိန်	12-26
always ဗိန့်	12-26-2
always ဗိန်း	12-26-23
always ဗုန်	12-14
always ဗုန့်	12-14-2
always ဗုန်း	12-14-23
always ဗုံ	12-14
always ဗုံ့	12-14-2
always ဗုံး	12-14-23
always ဗိုလ်	12-135
always ဗိသ်	12-156-13
always ဗျ	12-13456-126
always ဗျာ	12-13456-1
always ဗျား	12-13456-1-23
always ဗျူ	12-13456-136
always ဗျူ့	12-13456-136-2
always ဗျူး	12-13456-136-23
always ဗျို	12-13456-135
always ဗျို့	12-13456-135-2
always ဗျိုး	12-13456-135-23
always ဗျိုက်	12-13456-346
always ဗျဂ်	12-13456-15
always ဗျိုင်း	12-13456-235-23
always ဗျစ်	12-13456-1346
always ဗျဉ်	12-13456-35
always ဗျဉ့်	12-13456-35-2
always ဗျဉ်း	12-13456-35-23
always ဗျည်း	12-13456-246-23
always ဗျတ်	12-13456-126-2345
always ဗျပ်	12-13456-126-2345
always ဗျုပ်	12-13456-236
always ဗြာ	12-13456-1
always ဗြူ	12-13456-136
always ဗြူ့	12-13456-136-2
always ဗြူး	12-13456-136-23
always ဗြဲ	12-13456-2346-23
always ဗြဲ့	12-13456-2346-2
always ဗြို	12-13456-135
always ဗြို့	12-13456-135-2
always ဗြိုး	12-13456-135-23
always ​ဗြက်	12-13456-15
always ဗြောက်	12-13456-356
always ဗြောင်	12-13456-2356
always ဗြောင့်	12-13456-2356-2
always ဗြောင်း	12-13456-2356-23
always ဗြိစ်	12-13456-1346
always ဗြတ်	12-13456-126-2345
always ဗြုတ်	12-13456-236
always ဗြုန်	12-13456-14
always ဗြုန့်	12-13456-14-2
always ဗြုန်း	12-13456-14-23
always ဗြုံ	12-13456-14
always ဗြုံ့	12-13456-14-2
always ဗြုံး	12-13456-14-23
always ဗြဟ်	12-13456-126-2345
always ဗြာဟ်	12-13456-126-2345
always ဗွီ	12-2456-246
always ဗွီ့	12-2456-246-2
always ဗွီး	12-2456-246-23
always ဗွေ	12-2456-156
always ဗွေ့	12-2456-156-2
always ဗွေး	12-2456-156-23
always ဗွက်	12-2456-15
always ဗွတ်	12-2456-136-2345
always ဗွမ်	12-2456-124
always ဗွမ့်	12-2456-124-2
always ဗွမ်း	12-2456-124-23
always ဗြော	12-13456-12456-23
always ဗြော့	12-13456-12456-2
always ဗြော်	12-13456-12456
always ဗော	12-12456-23
always ဗော့	12-12456-2
always ဗော်	12-12456
always ဗစ်	12-1346
always ဗွန်	12-136-1345
always ဗက်	12-15
always ဗာ့	12-126
always ဗိတ်	12-156-13
always ဗုတ်	12-236
always ဗုစ်	12-236
always ဗယ်	12-2346
always ဗယ့်	12-2346-2
always ဗိုလ့်	12-135-2
always ဗျာ့	12-13456-126
always ဗျူ	12-13456-136
always ဗျိုင်	12-13456-235
always ဗျိုင့်	12-13456-235-2
always ဗျည်	12-13456-246
always ဗျည့်	12-13456-24
always ဗျမ်	12-13456-124
always ဗြာ့	12-13456-126
always ဗြား	12-13456-1-23
always ဗြိုက်	12-13456-346
always ဗွီ	12-2456-246
always ဗံ	12-124
always ဗံ့	12-124-2
always ဗြမ်	12-13456-124
always ဗြမ့်	12-13456-124-2
always ဗြမ်း	12-13456-124-23
always ဗျောင်	12-13456-2356
always ဗျောင့်	12-13456-2356-2
always ​ဗျောင်း	12-13456-2356-23
always ဗျုံ	12-13456-14
always ဗျုံ့	12-13456-14-2
always ဗျုံး	12-13456-14-23
always ဗျုန်	12-13456-14
always ဗျုန့်	12-13456-14-2
always ဗျုန်း	12-13456-14-23
always ဗျွတ်	12-13456-136-2345
always ဗြွက်	12-13456-15
always ဗျိ	12-13456-24
always ဗျီ	12-13456-246
always ဗျီး	12-13456-246-23
always ဗြိ	12-13456-24
always ဗြီ	12-13456-246
always ဗြီး	12-13456-246-23
always ဗြန်	12-13456-124
always ဗြန့်	12-13456-124-2
always ဗြန်း	12-13456-124-23
always ဗွန့်	12-2456-136-1345-2
always ဗွန်း	12-2456-136-1345-23
always ဗြေ	12-13456-156

# BaKone contractions				
always ဘ	12-126
always ဘာ	12-1
always ဘာ့	12-126
always ဘား	12-1-23
always ဘိ	12-24
always ဘီ	12-246
always ဘီး	12-246-23
always ဘု	12-136-2
always ဘူ	12-136
always ဘူ့	12-136-2
always ဘူး	12-136-23
always ​ဘေ	12-156
always ဘေ့	12-156-2
always ဘေး	12-156-23
always ဘဲ	12-2346-23
always ဘဲ့	12-2346-2
always ဘို	12-135
always ဘို့	12-135-2
always ဘိုး	12-135-23
always ဘက်	12-15
always ဘောက်	12-356
always ဘင်	12-35
always ဘင့်	12-35-2
always ဘင်း	12-35-23
always ဘောင်	12-2356
always ဘောင့်	12-2356-2
always ဘောင်း	12-2356-23
always ဘိုင်	12-235
always ဘိုင့်	12-235-2
always ဘိုင်း	12-235-23
always ဘုဉ်း	12-14-23
always ဘဏ်	12-124
always ဘတ်	12-126-2345
always ဘိတ်	12-156-13
always ဘုတ်	12-236
always ဘဒ်	12-126-2345
always ဘန်	12-124
always ဘန့်	12-124-2
always ဘန်း	12-124-23
always ဘိန်	12-26
always ဘိန့်	12-26-2
always ဘိန်း	12-26-23
always ဘုန်	12-14
always ဘုန့်	12-14-2
always ဘုန်း	12-14-23
always ဘုမ်	12-14
always ဘုမ့်	12-14-2
always ဘုမ်း	12-14-23
always ဘုံ	12-14
always ဘုံ့	12-14-2
always ဘုံး	12-14-23
always ဘယ်	12-2346
always ဘယ့်	12-2346-2
always ဘွာ	12-2456-1
always ဘွ	12-2456-126
always ဘွား	12-2456-1-23
always ဘွဲ့	12-2456-2346-2
always ဘွင်	12-2456-35
always ဘွင့်	12-2456-35-2
always ဘွင်း	12-2456-35-23
always ဘွိုင်	12-2456-235
always ဘွိုင့်	12-2456-235-2
always ဘွိုင်း	12-2456-235-23
always ဘွတ်	12-2456-136-2345
always ဘော	12-12456-23
always ဘော့	12-12456-2
always ဘော်	12-12456
always ဘစ်	12-1346
always ဘော့စ်	12-12456-2
always ဘမ်	12-124
always ဘမ်း	12-124-23
always ဘောလ်	12-12456-23
always ဘေ	12-156
always ဘေ့	12-156-2
always ဘဏ့်	12-124-2
always ဘဏ်း	12-124-23
always ဘွမ်	12-136-1345
always ဘွမ့်	12-136-1345-2
always ဘွမ်း	12-136-1345-23
always ဘွန်	12-136-1345
always ဘွန့်	12-136-1345-2
always ဘွန်း	12-136-1345-23
always ဘွက်	12-2456-15
always ဘွစ်	12-136-2345
always ဘိမ်	12-26
always ဘိမ့်	12-26-2
always ဘိမ်း	12-26-23
always ဘွဒ်	12-136-2345
always ဘိက်	12-156-13
always ဘွပ်	12-136-2345
always ဘဒ်	12-126-2345
always ဘိုက်	12-346

# DaHtway contractions
always ဒ 145-126
always ဒါ 145-1
always ဒါ့ 145-126
always ဒါး 145-1-23
always ဒိ 145-24
always ဒီ 145-246
always ဒီ့ 145-246-2
always ဒီး 145-246-23
always ဒု 145-136-2
always ဒူ 145-136
always ဒူ့ 145-136-2
always ဒူး 145-136-23
always ဒေ 145-156
always ဒေ့ 145-156-2
always ဒေး 145-156-23
always ဒံ 145-124
always ဒို 145-135
always ဒို့ 145-135-2
always ဒိုး 145-135-23
always ဒက် 145-15
always ဒုက် 145-236
always ဒေါက် 145-356
always ဒိုက် 145-346
always ဒင် 145-35
always ဒင့် 145-35-2
always ဒင်း 145-35-23
always ဒေါင် 145-2356
always ဒေါင့် 145-2356-2
always ဒေါင်း 145-2356-23
always ဒိုင် 145-235
always ဒိုင့် 145-235-2
always ဒိုင်း 145-235-23
always ဒိဋ် 145-156-13
always ဒဏ် 145-124
always ဒိတ် 145-156-13
always ဒုတ် 145-236
always ဒန် 145-124
always ဒန့် 145-124-2
always ဒန်း 145-124-23
always ဒိန် 145-26
always ဒိန့် 145-26-2
always ဒိန်း 145-26-23
always ဒုန် 145-14
always ဒုန့် 145-14-2
always ဒုန်း 145-14-23
always ဒုံ 145-14
always ဒုံ့ 145-14-2
always ဒုံး 145-14-23
always ဒယ် 145-2346
always ဒယ့် 145-2346-2
always ဒျန် 145-2456-124
always ဒျန့် 145-2456-124-2
always ဒြ 145-1235-126
always ဒြပ် 145-1235-126-2345
always ဒွ 145-2456-126
always ဒွါ 145-2456-1
always ဒွါး 145-2456-1-23
always ဒွိ 145-2456-24
always ဒွီ 145-2456-12456
always ဒွီး 145-2456-12456-23
always ဒွေ 145-2456-156
always ဒွေ့ 145-2456-156-2
always ဒွေး 145-2456-156-23
always ဒွန် 145-136-1345
always ဒွန့် 145-136-1345-2
always ဒွန်း 145-136-1345-23
always ဒေါ 145-12456-23
always ဒေါ့ 145-12456-2
always ဒေါ် 145-12456
always ဒဲ 145-2346-23
always ဒစ် 145-1346
always ဒါန်း 145-124-23
always ဒါန် 145-124
always ဒါန့် 145-124-2
always ဒွဲ 145-2456-2346-23
always ဒံ့ 145-124-2
always ဒဲ့ 145-2346-2
always ဒဏ် 145-124
always ဒဏ်း 145-124-23
always ဒုတ် 145-236
always ဒိဗ် 145-156-13
always ဒြာ့ 145-1235-126
always ဒြား 145-1235-1-23
always ဒွင် 145-2456-35
always ဒွင့် 145-2456-35-2
always ဒွင်း 145-2456-35-23
always ဒွတ် 145-2456-136-2345
always ဒွက် 145-2456-15
always ဒွစ် 145-2456-1346
always ဒွဒ် 145-2456-136-2345
always ဒွပ် 145-2456-136-2345
always ဒွဗ် 145-2456-136-2345
always ဒွဲ့ 145-2456-2346-2
always ဒီ့ 145-24
